Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.560

Extracurricular activities—Goals for reducing the opportunity gap in possession of an associated student body card.

(1) If a high school does not require an associated student body card for participation in any extracurricular activities or to receive any student discounts, the goals in this section do not apply.

(2)(a) For a high school that requires an associated student body card for participation in school clubs only, the goal is that fifty percent of high school students possess an associated student body card each school year.

(b) For a high school that requires an associated student body card for participation in school clubs and school-based athletics, the goal is that seventy percent of high school students possess an associated student body card each school year.

(3) For each high school, the opportunity gap in student possession of an associated student body card, as calculated under RCW 28A.320.550, may not exceed the following goals:

(a) During the 2020-21 school year, the opportunity gap must be twenty or fewer percentage points;

(b) During the 2021-22 school year, the opportunity gap must be sixteen or fewer percentage points;

(c) During the 2022-23 school year, the opportunity gap must be twelve or fewer percentage points;

(d) During the 2023-24 school year, the opportunity gap must be eight or fewer percentage points; and

(e) During the 2024-25 school year, and for each subsequent school year, the opportunity gap must be five or fewer percentage points.

[ 2020 c 13 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.